District of Columbia statutes.
2-275.01

Applicability; construction.

(a)

This chapter shall apply as of October 1, 2015.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect any public-private partnerships, projects, or agreements that are developed, solicited, awarded, or entered into before this chapter applies.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 302, 62 DCR 261
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7008, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36, in (a), redesignated (a)(1) as (a), deleted (a)(2) and (a)(3), and substituted “as of October 1, 2015” for “upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-228, § 302(a), see § 7008 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).